Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. Licensing

Required licensure of general nondental anesthesiologists constitutional. —

No offense was dealt the equal protection clause of the United States constitution or the Wyoming state constitution by requiring that general nondental anesthesiologists be properly licensed as physicians under the Wyoming Medical Practice Act, and not just be declared qualified anesthesiologists by an accredited residency program. Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 523

(Wyo. Oct. 7, 1987), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 33-26-301.
License required.

No person shall practice medicine in this state without a license granted by the board, or as otherwise provided by law.

Upon appropriate application, fulfillment of eligibility criteria and successful completion of all other requirements, the board may grant:

A license to practice medicine, subject to annual renewal;

A temporary license to practice medicine pursuant to W.S. 33-26-304(a);

A restricted or conditional license;

An inactive license, provided the qualifications for and the conditions of this license shall be established by rule;

A medical training license pursuant to W.S. 33-26-304(c);

An emeritus license, allowing retired physicians to provide health care without remuneration, provided the qualifications for and the conditions of this license shall be established by rule;

A volunteer license, allowing physicians not otherwise licensed in Wyoming to practice medicine in the state without remuneration, provided the qualifications for and conditions of this license shall be established by rule;

An administrative medicine license for physicians not providing patient care, provided the qualifications for and the conditions of this license shall be established by rule.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 18, §§ 4, 5; R.S. 1899, § 2163; Laws 1905, ch. 45, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 2868; Laws 1917, ch. 111, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 3516; Laws 1925, ch. 126, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 86-104; C.S. 1945, § 37-2004; Laws 1957, ch. 194, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-333; Laws 1963, ch. 177, § 1; 1965, ch. 176, § 1; 1969, ch. 114, § 1; 1973, ch. 223, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-112; Laws 1981, ch. 78, § 1; 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2006, ch. 58, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (b), deleted “permanent” preceding “license” in (i); substituted “33-26-304(a)” for “33-26-304” in (ii); added (v), and made a related change.

The 2009 amendment,

added “or as otherwise provided by law” at the end of (a); added (b)(vi) through (b)(viii); and made related changes.

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tort claim for negligent credentialing of physician, 98 ALR5th 533.

§ 33-26-302.
USMLE examination.

The board shall adopt regulations for the qualification for and administration of the USMLE.

through (f) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 18, §§ 4, 5; R.S. 1899, § 2163; Laws 1905, ch. 45, §§ 4, 5; C.S. 1910, §§ 2868, 2869; Laws 1917, ch. 111, § 2; C.S. 1920, §§ 3516, 3517; Laws 1925, ch. 126, § 1; 1929, ch. 96, § 1; 1931, ch. 86, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 86-104, 86-105; C.S. 1945, §§ 37-2004, 37-2005; Laws 1957, ch. 194, § 2; ch. 142, § 6; W.S. 1957, §§ 33-333, 33-335; Laws 1963, ch. 177, § 1; 1965, ch. 176, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 114, § 1; 1973, ch. 223, § 1; 1976; ch. 24, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 33-26-112, 33-26-114; Laws 1981, ch. 78, § 1; 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3.

§ 33-26-303.
Requirements for granting license.

The board may grant a license to practice medicine in this state as provided in the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact or, under this article, to any applicant who demonstrates, to the board, that he:

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Has graduated from a school of medicine accredited by the L.C.M.E., a school of osteopathy accredited by the A.O.A., a Canadian accredited school of medicine or has been certified by the E.C.F.M.G.;

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Has provided written evidence that he has completed at least one (1) year of postgraduate training in an A.C.G.M.E, A.O.A. or R.C.P.S.C. accredited program;

Has presented other credentials and qualifications equivalent to or exceeding the criteria in paragraph (iv) of this subsection as may be considered by the board to demonstrate competency to practice medicine in this state;

Has successfully completed all three (3) parts of the USMLE, national boards, the FLEX, a board approved, state constructed licensing examination, the examination by the licentiate of the medical council of Canada or the COMLEX, provided the conditions and requirements for completion of all parts of the examinations shall be established by board rule;

Has completed an application form provided or approved by the board;

Has paid the appropriate fees pursuant to W.S.

33-26-307

;

Has completed to the satisfaction of a majority of board members, if required pursuant to board rule, a personal interview consisting of inquiry and oral response to medical knowledge, personal and professional history and intentions for practicing medicine in this state; and

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 2.

Meets any additional requirements that the board may impose by regulation which are necessary to implement this act.

A person who has pled guilty to or has been convicted of a felony or any crime that is a felony under Wyoming law in any state or federal court or in any court of similar jurisdiction in another country may apply for licensure provided, the board may deny licensure based upon the plea or conviction alone.

A person whose medical license has been revoked, suspended, restricted, had conditions placed on it or been voluntarily or involuntarily relinquished or surrendered, by or to another state medical or licensing board, or has a disciplinary action pending before another state medical or licensing board, may apply for licensure provided, however, the board may deny licensure based upon the revocation, suspension, restrictions, conditions, relinquishment, surrender of licensure or pending disciplinary action alone.

A person whose clinical privileges at a health care facility have been revoked, suspended, restricted, had conditions placed upon them or been voluntarily or involuntarily resigned, or against whom a clinical privilege action is pending at a health care facility, may apply for licensure provided, however, the board may deny licensure based upon the revocation, suspension, restrictions, conditions, resignation of privileges or pending clinical privilege action alone.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 18, §§ 4, 5; R.S. 1899, § 2163; Laws 1905, ch. 45, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 2868; Laws 1917, ch. 111, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 3516; Laws 1925, ch. 126, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 86-104; C.S. 1945, § 37-2004; Laws 1957, ch. 194, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-333; Laws 1963, ch. 177, § 1; 1965, ch. 176, § 1; 1969, ch. 114, § 1; 1973, ch. 223, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-112; Laws 1981, ch. 78, § 1; 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 223, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, §§ 1, 2; 2015 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

in (a)(iv), lowered the minimum requirement of postgraduate training from three years to two years.

Laws 2005, ch. 223, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “to the board” for “to the satisfaction of a majority of the board” in the introductory language of (a); added “or has been certified by the E.C.F.M.G.” at the end of (a)(ii); deleted the former last sentence in (a)(iv) which read “An applicant who graduated from a medical school not accredited by the L.C.M.E. or A.O.A. shall present written evidence that he has completed at least two (2) years of medical education at the medical school from which he graduated and that he has completed at least two (2) years of postgraduate training in an A.C.G.M.E., A.O.A. or R.C.P.S.C. accredited program”; substituted “or the COMLEX, provided the conditions and requirements for completion of all parts of the examinations shall be established by board rule” for “the examination developed by the national board of osteopathic medical examiners” in (a)(vi); inserted “or approved” in (a)(vii); inserted “if required pursuant to board rule” in (a)(ix); repealed former (a)(x) pertaining to license suspension, revocation or restrictions; added (c) and (d); and made related changes.

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “as provided in the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact or, under this article” and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(xi), apparently means this chapter, i.e., §§

33-26-101

through

33-26-601

.

§ 33-26-304.
Temporary license to practice medicine; medical training license; application; qualifications.

The board may issue a temporary license for a term that expires at 8:00 a.m. on the first day of the next regularly scheduled board meeting to a person who:

Completes an application as approved by the board for temporary licensure;

Meets all licensing requirements of W.S.

33-26-303

except that the board may defer the interview required by W.S.

33-26-303

(a)(ix) at its discretion until no later than the next board meeting;

Pays a temporary license fee in an amount set by the board.

The board, in its discretion may extend a temporary license for an additional term no longer than 8:00 a.m. on the first day of the second regularly scheduled board meeting following the date of the initial issuance of a temporary license.

The board may issue a medical training license for a term that expires at 12:01 a.m. July 1 of each year to a person who:

Has signed a contract with an A.C.G.M.E. accredited residency program located in this state;

Has graduated from a school of medicine accredited by the L.C.M.E., a school of osteopathy accredited by the A.O.A. or a Canadian accredited school of medicine, or has been certified by the E.C.F.M.G.;

Has successfully completed steps one (1) and two (2) of the USMLE or the COMLEX;

Is under the supervision of residency faculty;

Has completed an application form provided by the board;

Has paid the appropriate fees pursuant to W.S.

33-26-307

; and

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 2.

Meets any additional requirements that the board may impose by regulation which are necessary to implement this act.

A person who has pled guilty to or has been convicted of a felony or any crime that is a felony under Wyoming law in any state or federal court or in any court of similar jurisdiction in another country may apply for licensure, provided the board may deny licensure based upon the plea or conviction alone.

A person whose medical license has been revoked, suspended, restricted, had conditions placed on it or been voluntarily or involuntarily relinquished or surrendered, by or to another state medical or licensing board, or has a disciplinary action pending before another state medical or licensing board, may apply for licensure provided, however, the board may deny licensure based upon the revocation, suspension, restrictions, conditions, relinquishment, surrender of licensure or pending disciplinary action alone.

A person whose clinical privileges at a health care facility have been revoked, suspended, restricted, had conditions placed upon them or been voluntarily or involuntarily resigned, or against whom a clinical privilege action is pending at a health care facility, may apply for licensure provided, however, the board may deny licensure based upon the revocation, suspension, restrictions, conditions, resignation of privileges or pending clinical privilege action alone.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 16, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 33-332.1, 33-332.2; W.S. 1977, §§ 33-26-107, 33-26-108; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2006, ch. 58, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, §§ 1, 2.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (c) and (d).

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “expires at 8:00 a.m. on the first day “ for “expires on the date” in the introductory language of (a); inserted “no later than” in (a)(ii); rewrote (b) which read: “A temporary license is valid until the date of the next board meeting following the date of issuance.
The board, in its discretion may extend a temporary license for an additional term no longer than the date
of the second regular board meeting following the date of issuance.”; added “or has been certified by the E.C.F.M.G.” at the end of (c)(ii); added “or the COMLEX” at the end of (c)(iii); repealed former (c)(vii) pertaining to
pertaining to license suspension, revocation or restrictions; added (e) and (f); and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” referred to in subsection (c)(viii), apparently means this Article, i.e., §§

33-26-301

through

33-26-307

.

§ 33-26-305.
Annual renewal; expiration; reactivation of lapsed and inactive licenses; restoration of emeritus licenses to active status; duplicates.

All licenses other than temporary licenses and medical training licenses shall lapse annually on a date or dates to be established by rules adopted by the board. A licensee may renew his license each year by submitting a renewal application containing information required by the board, accompanied by proof of compliance with and fulfillment of continuing medical education requirements of the board in the manner set forth in the board’s continuing medical education rules and regulations and a renewal fee to the board in an amount set by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-26-307

. The licensee additionally shall report any disciplinary action pending or taken by a state examining board, a health care entity or the grievance committee of a medical society during the preceding year.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

The board may reactivate a lapsed or inactive license if the applicant meets the requirements established by the rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

A licensee shall apply to the board for a duplicate license if his license is stolen, lost or destroyed. Upon proof of proper identification, the required fee and submission of other information as the board may require, the board shall issue a duplicate license bearing on its face the word “DUPLICATE”.

The board may restore an emeritus license to active status if the applicant meets the requirements established by the rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 45, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 2869; C.S. 1920, § 3517; Laws 1929, ch. 96, § 1; 1931, ch. 86, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 86-105; C.S. 1945, § 37-2005; Laws 1957, ch. 142, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-335; Laws 1965, ch. 176, § 2; 1973, ch. 223, § 1; 1976, ch. 24, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-114; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2006, ch. 58, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote (a), changing the annual medical training licenses renewal date, renewal application process, and renewal fee; and made a stylistic change in (c).

The 2009 amendment,

rewrote (c) which read: “The board may reactivate a lapsed license if the applicant pays a reactivation fee and fulfills all requirements for the granting of an initial license.”; and added (e).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

§ 33-26-306.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 129, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1905, ch. 45, § 6, related to the issuance of a license by endorsement.

§ 33-26-307.
Fees.

The board shall set by regulation appropriate license application, renewal and reactivation fees, examination fees and fees for information verification or document production and other services of the board to be charged under this chapter.

through (vii) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

All money received or collected under this chapter shall be paid to the state treasurer for deposit in a separate account. The money in the account is subject at all times to the warrant of the state auditor drawn upon written requisition attested by the executive director of the board for the payment of any board expenses.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 18, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 2205; Laws 1905, ch. 45, §§ 5, 11; C.S. 1910, §§ 2869, 2875; C.S. 1920, §§ 3517, 3523; Laws 1929, ch. 96, § 1; 1931, ch. 86, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 86-105, 86-111; C.S. 1945, §§ 37-2005, 37-2011; Laws 1957, ch. 142, § 6; ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 33-331, 33-332.5, 33-335; Laws 1961, ch. 16, § 5; 1965, ch. 176, § 2; 1973, ch. 223, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1976, ch. 24, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 33-26-105, 33-26-111, 33-26-114; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b) substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” and made a related change.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “written requisition attested by the executive director of the board” for “written requisition of the president and attested by the executive secretary of the board, with seal attached,” in the last sentence of (b).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”